Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2513.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [1.60] CONVENTION OF STATES FOR AMENDMENT OF UNITED STATES CONSTITUTION. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Applicability. new text end new text begin This section applies to an amendment convention held under Article V of the United States Constitution. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Advisory committee" means the committee established in subdivision 12. new text end new text begin (c) "Chamber" means either the house of representatives or the senate. new text end new text begin (d) "Delegate" means a person selected to represent Minnesota at an amendment convention held under Article V Convention of United States Constitution. new text end new text begin (e) "Commissioning resolution" means the resolution adopted by the house of representatives and senate that sets forth the names of the appointed delegates and the delegates' commissions and instructions. new text end new text begin (f) "Delegation" means the group of delegates and interim delegates chosen by the legislature to attend an amendment convention held under Article V of the United States Constitution, with the powers and duties defined in this section. new text end new text begin (g) "Interim delegate" means a person selected by the advisory committee under subdivision 8 to fill a vacancy in the delegation. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Qualifications of delegates. new text end new text begin At the time of appointment and throughout the amendment convention held under Article V of the United States Constitution, a delegate must: new text end new text begin (1) be a United States citizen for at least five years; new text end new text begin (2) be a resident of Minnesota for at least five years; new text end new text begin (3) be at least 25 years of age; new text end new text begin (4) be a registered voter in Minnesota; new text end new text begin (5) not be registered or required to be registered as a federal lobbyist at any time within the last ten years; new text end new text begin (6) not be a federal employee or contractor, except a member of the United States armed forces, at any time within the last ten years; new text end new text begin (7) not have held a federal elected or appointed office at any time within the last ten years; new text end new text begin (8) not have had any felony convictions for crimes in any jurisdiction within the last ten years; new text end new text begin (9) not hold a statewide office while performing the duties of delegate or interim delegate; and new text end new text begin (10) be a current or former member of the legislature. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Delegate selection and removal. new text end new text begin (a) Minnesota must send five delegates to an amendment convention held under Article V of the United States Constitution. One delegate each must be appointed by the senate majority leader, the senate minority leader, the speaker of the house, and the minority leader of the house of representatives. The four appointing authorities must appoint a fifth delegate by unanimous choice. If the appointing authorities are unable to select a fifth delegate unanimously by the deadline for appointment, Minnesota must send four delegates to the convention. The selection process must be used for an amendment convention held under Article V of the United States Constitution. new text end new text begin (b) Each appointing authority may appoint one alternate delegate to serve in the event the delegate appointed by the appointing authority is unable to perform delegate responsibilities. The four appointing authorities may unanimously appoint one alternate delegate to serve in the event the fifth delegate appointed unanimously by the four appointing authorities is unable to perform delegate responsibilities. new text end new text begin (c) The delegates and alternates must be appointed no later than 30 days before the date of an amendment convention held under Article V of the United States Constitution or no later than 30 days before a time limit set by Congress, whichever is earlier. new text end new text begin (d) A delegate or interim delegate must be recalled or suspended by the advisory committee pursuant to a determination under subdivision 13 that the delegate has exceeded the scope of the delegate's authority. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Commissioning resolution. new text end new text begin (a) The resolution naming the delegates serves as the delegates' commission. The commission includes but is not limited to the following: new text end new text begin (1) a delegate must not vote for or otherwise promote a change to the traditional convention rule of decision on the floor and in the committee of the whole, including but not limited to the rule that each state has one vote; and new text end new text begin (2) a delegate must not vote in favor of a proposed amendment that would alter the text of the specific guarantees of individual liberty established by the Constitution, including the original Constitution, the Bill of Rights, and the following amendments: Thirteenth, Fourteenth, Fifteenth, Nineteenth, Twenty-Third, Twenty-Fourth, and Twenty-Sixth. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioning resolution must clearly state the scope of the delegates' authority, which is limited by the following: new text end new text begin (1) if Minnesota was not one of the two-thirds of the states applying for the convention, the subject matter enumerated in the 34 state applications that triggered the convention or, if Minnesota was one of the two-thirds of the states applying for the convention, the subject matter in Minnesota's application; and new text end new text begin (2) additional instructions from the legislature, whether in the commissioning resolution or issued thereafter. new text end new text begin (c) The legislature may provide additional instructions at any time via subsequent resolution, a copy of which the chief clerk of the house of representatives must provide to each delegate and to the advisory committee. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Oath. new text end new text begin (a) Each delegate must, before exercising any function of the position, execute the following oath in writing: "I do solemnly swear (or affirm) that I accept and will act according to the limits of authority specified in my commission and any present or subsequent instructions. I understand that violating this oath may subject me to penalties provided by law. I understand that I may be recalled or suspended from my duties by the legislature or the advisory committee." new text end new text begin (b) A delegate's executed oath must be filed with the secretary of state. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Credentials. new text end new text begin After a delegate's executed oath is filed with the secretary of state, the chief clerk of the house of representatives must provide to the delegate an official copy of the executed oath and the commissioning resolution, which together serve as the delegate's credentials. new text end new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Vacancies. new text end new text begin A vacancy must be filled by the advisory committee's interim delegate selection until a vote by a joint session of the legislature selects a permanent replacement. new text end new text begin Subd. 9. new text end new text begin Compensation and expenses. new text end new text begin (a) A delegate must receive the same compensation as a member of the house of representatives, prorated for the length of time served. This paragraph does not apply to a delegate who is a current member of the legislature. new text end new text begin (b) A delegate is entitled to receive the same allowance for expenses as provided to a member of the house of representatives. new text end new text begin Subd. 10. new text end new text begin Emolument and gift prohibition. new text end new text begin A delegate or an interim delegate is prohibited from accepting gifts or benefits with a combined value of more than $200 during the delegate's or interim delegate's time of service, other than from a member of the delegate's or interim delegate's family and of the kind customarily granted by a member of one's family. The term "gift or benefit" must be construed liberally to include current and future loans, lodging, food, offer of prospective employment, and other actual and prospective benefits. An employer's decision to continue paying a delegate's current salary is not a gift. new text end new text begin Subd. 11. new text end new text begin Quorum, conduct, and rule of decision with the delegation. new text end new text begin (a) The delegates within the delegation, including interim delegates, must select one of the delegates to chair the delegation, a delegate to cast Minnesota's vote on the convention floor, and a delegate to speak to the media on behalf of the delegation. The delegation may select the same delegate to exercise any or all of the functions. The chair may designate a different delegate to perform any function at any time. new text end new text begin (b) Each delegate must avoid communicating the impression to a person outside the delegation that the delegation is divided on a question on which the delegation has taken a formal position, including but not limited to casting a vote. new text end new text begin (c) A delegate that is not the delegate designated to communicate with the media on behalf of the delegation is prohibited from communicating with the media about convention business during the convention or during a temporary recess or temporary adjournment. new text end new text begin (d) A delegate that violates paragraph (b) or (c) may be suspended or recalled by the advisory committee. new text end new text begin (e) Paragraphs (b) and (c) do not prevent a delegate from presenting the delegate's opinions to the convention or debating a matter at the convention on which the delegation has not taken a formal position. new text end new text begin (f) The quorum for decision by the delegation, including designating delegates for particular duties and determining how Minnesota's vote is cast, is a majority present and voting at the time the delegation is polled. A decision must not be made and vote must not be cast if less than a majority of the delegation votes in the poll. new text end new text begin (g) For purposes of a delegation decision, a quorum is a majority of the delegates present and voting at the time the delegation is polled. new text end new text begin Subd. 12. new text end new text begin Article V delegate advisory committee. new text end new text begin (a) The advisory committee consists of the senate majority leader, the senate minority leader, the speaker of the house, and the minority leader of the house of representatives. new text end new text begin (b) The advisory committee must select one of the advisory committee's members to serve as chair. new text end new text begin (c) A delegate may request that the advisory committee advise the delegate regarding whether a prospective action by the delegate violates the commissioning resolution or any subsequent instructions. The advisory committee must communicate a determination to the delegate requesting the advice within 24 hours of receiving the request. The advisory committee may communicate the determination by any appropriate medium. new text end new text begin (d) The advisory committee may develop appropriate procedures and mechanisms to monitor the convention, the convention's committees, and the convention's subcommittees. new text end new text begin Subd. 13. new text end new text begin Monitoring the exercise of delegate authority. new text end new text begin (a) Whenever the advisory committee has reason to believe that a delegate or interim delegate has exceeded the scope of the delegate's or interim delegate's authority, the advisory committee must determine whether the delegate or interim delegate did exceed the delegate's or interim delegate's authority. The determination must be made expeditiously and immediately communicated to the delegate or interim delegate and to the attorney general. new text end new text begin (b) Upon determining that a delegate or interim delegate has exceeded the scope of the delegate's or interim delegate's authority under paragraph (a), the advisory committee must immediately remove the delegate under subdivision 4 and communicate the action and the reasons supporting the action to the attorney general and the presiding officers of the convention. new text end new text begin (c) A delegate or interim delegate that is removed for exceeding the delegate's scope of authority is subject to a civil penalty of up to $20,000. The attorney general must enforce this paragraph. new text end